NodeJsProjects/SpellChecker/Dictionaries/ru_RU/ru_RU_oo3.aff
SFX V Y 179
SFX V   ФШУС ЧХФУС        ЦЙФШУС
SFX V   ФШУС ЧХУШ         ЦЙФШУС
SFX V   ФШУС ЧЕЫШУС       ЦЙФШУС
SFX V   ФШУС ЧЕФУС        ЦЙФШУС
SFX V   ФШУС ЧЕФЕУШ       ЦЙФШУС
SFX V   ФШУС ЧЕНУС        ЦЙФШУС
SFX V   ФШУС ЧЈЫШУС       ЦЙФШУС
SFX V   ФШУС ЧЈФУС        ЦЙФШУС
SFX V   ФШУС ЧЈФЕУШ       ЦЙФШУС
SFX V   ФШУС ЧЈНУС        ЦЙФШУС
SFX V   ФШУС ОХФУС        ДЕФШУС
SFX V   ФШУС ОХУШ         ДЕФШУС
SFX V   ФШУС ОЕЫШУС       ДЕФШУС
SFX V   ФШУС ОЕФУС        ДЕФШУС
SFX V   ФШУС ОЕФЕУШ       ДЕФШУС
SFX V   ФШУС ОЕНУС        ДЕФШУС
SFX V   ФШУС ЕЫШУС        ХФШУС
SFX V   ФШУС ЕФУС         ХФШУС
SFX V   ФШУС ЕФЕУШ        ХФШУС
SFX V   ФШУС ЕНУС         ХФШУС
SFX V   ФШУС АФУС         ХФШУС
SFX V   ФШУС АУШ          ХФШУС
SFX V   ФШ   ЧХФ          ЦЙФШ
SFX V   ФШ   ЧХ           ЦЙФШ
SFX V   ФШ   ЧЕЫШ         ЦЙФШ
SFX V   ФШ   ЧЕФЕ         ЦЙФШ
SFX V   ФШ   ЧЕФ          ЦЙФШ
SFX V   ФШ   ЧЕН          ЦЙФШ
SFX V   ФШ   ЧЈЫШ         ЦЙФШ
SFX V   ФШ   ЧЈФЕ         ЦЙФШ
SFX V   ФШ   ЧЈФ          ЦЙФШ
SFX V   ФШ   ЧЈН          ЦЙФШ
SFX V   ФШ   ОХФ          ДЕФШ
SFX V   ФШ   ОХ           ДЕФШ
SFX V   ФШ   ОЕЫШ         ДЕФШ
SFX V   ФШ   ОЕФЕ         ДЕФШ
SFX V   ФШ   ОЕФ          ДЕФШ
SFX V   ФШ   ОЕН          ДЕФШ
SFX V   ФШ   ЕЫШ          ХФШ
SFX V   ФШ   ЕФЕ          ХФШ
SFX V   ФШ   ЕФ           ХФШ
SFX V   ФШ   ЕН           ХФШ
SFX V   ФШ   АФ           ХФШ
SFX V   ФШ   А            ХФШ
SFX V   СФШУС ЕЫШУС        СФШУС
SFX V   СФШУС ЕФУС         СФШУС
SFX V   СФШУС ЕФЕУШ        СФШУС
SFX V   СФШУС ЕНУС         СФШУС
SFX V   СФШУС АФУС         СФШУС
SFX V   СФШУС АУШ          СФШУС
SFX V   СФШУС ЈЫШУС        СФШУС
SFX V   СФШУС ЈФУС         СФШУС
SFX V   СФШУС ЈФЕУШ        СФШУС
SFX V   СФШУС ЈНУС         СФШУС
SFX V   СФШ  ЕЫШ          СФШ
SFX V   СФШ  ЕФЕ          СФШ
SFX V   СФШ  ЕФ           СФШ
SFX V   СФШ  ЕН           СФШ
SFX V   СФШ  АФ           СФШ
SFX V   СФШ  А            СФШ
SFX V   СФШ  ЈЫШ          СФШ
SFX V   СФШ  ЈФЕ          СФШ
SFX V   СФШ  ЈФ           СФШ
SFX V   СФШ  ЈН           СФШ
SFX V   ПЧБФШУС ХЕЫШУС       ПЧБФШУС
SFX V   ПЧБФШУС ХЕФУС        ПЧБФШУС
SFX V   ПЧБФШУС ХЕФЕУШ       ПЧБФШУС
SFX V   ПЧБФШУС ХЕНУС        ПЧБФШУС
SFX V   ПЧБФШУС ХАФУС        ПЧБФШУС
SFX V   ПЧБФШУС ХАУШ         ПЧБФШУС
SFX V   ПЧБФШУС ХЈЫШУС       ПЧБФШУС
SFX V   ПЧБФШУС ХЈФУС        ПЧБФШУС
SFX V   ПЧБФШУС ХЈФЕУШ       ПЧБФШУС
SFX V   ПЧБФШУС ХЈНУС        ПЧБФШУС
SFX V   ПЧБФШ ХЕЫШ         ПЧБФШ
SFX V   ПЧБФШ ХЕФЕ         ПЧБФШ
SFX V   ПЧБФШ ХЕФ          ПЧБФШ
SFX V   ПЧБФШ ХЕН          ПЧБФШ
SFX V   ПЧБФШ ХАФ          ПЧБФШ
SFX V   ПЧБФШ ХА           ПЧБФШ
SFX V   ПЧБФШ ХЈЫШ         ПЧБФШ
SFX V   ПЧБФШ ХЈФЕ         ПЧБФШ
SFX V   ПЧБФШ ХЈФ          ПЧБФШ
SFX V   ПЧБФШ ХЈН          ПЧБФШ
SFX V   ЙФШУС ШЕЫШУС       [ВМРЧ]ЙФШУС
SFX V   ЙФШУС ШЕФУС        [ВМРЧ]ЙФШУС
SFX V   ЙФШУС ШЕФЕУШ       [ВМРЧ]ЙФШУС
SFX V   ЙФШУС ШЕНУС        [ВМРЧ]ЙФШУС
SFX V   ЙФШУС ШАФУС        [ВМРЧ]ЙФШУС
SFX V   ЙФШУС ШАУШ         [ВМРЧ]ЙФШУС
SFX V   ЙФШУС ШЈЫШУС       [ВМРЧ]ЙФШУС
SFX V   ЙФШУС ШЈФУС        [ВМРЧ]ЙФШУС
SFX V   ЙФШУС ШЈФЕУШ       [ВМРЧ]ЙФШУС
SFX V   ЙФШУС ШЈНУС        [ВМРЧ]ЙФШУС
SFX V   ЙФШ  ШЕЫШ         [ВМРЧ]ЙФШ
SFX V   ЙФШ  ШЕФЕ         [ВМРЧ]ЙФШ
SFX V   ЙФШ  ШЕФ          [ВМРЧ]ЙФШ
SFX V   ЙФШ  ШЕН          [ВМРЧ]ЙФШ
SFX V   ЙФШ  ШАФ          [ВМРЧ]ЙФШ
SFX V   ЙФШ  ША           [ВМРЧ]ЙФШ
SFX V   ЙФШ  ШЈЫШ         [ВМРЧ]ЙФШ
SFX V   ЙФШ  ШЈФЕ         [ВМРЧ]ЙФШ
SFX V   ЙФШ  ШЈФ          [ВМРЧ]ЙФШ
SFX V   ЙФШ  ШЈН          [ВМРЧ]ЙФШ
SFX V   ИБФШУС ДХФУС        ИБФШУС
SFX V   ИБФШУС ДХУШ         ИБФШУС
SFX V   ИБФШУС ДЕЫШУС       ИБФШУС
SFX V   ИБФШУС ДЕФУС        ИБФШУС
SFX V   ИБФШУС ДЕФЕУШ       ИБФШУС
SFX V   ИБФШУС ДЕНУС        ИБФШУС
SFX V   ИБФШ ДХФ          ИБФШ
SFX V   ИБФШ ДХ           ИБФШ
SFX V   ИБФШ ДЕЫШ         ИБФШ
SFX V   ИБФШ ДЕФЕ         ИБФШ
SFX V   ИБФШ ДЕФ          ИБФШ
SFX V   ИБФШ ДЕН          ИБФШ
SFX V   ЕЮШУС СЦЕЫШУС      МЕЮШУС
SFX V   ЕЮШУС СЦЕФУС       МЕЮШУС
SFX V   ЕЮШУС СЦЕФЕУШ      МЕЮШУС
SFX V   ЕЮШУС СЦЕНУС       МЕЮШУС
SFX V   ЕЮШУС СЗХФУС       МЕЮШУС
SFX V   ЕЮШУС СЗХУШ        МЕЮШУС
SFX V   ЕЮШ  СЦЕЫШ        МЕЮШ
SFX V   ЕЮШ  СЦЕФЕ        МЕЮШ
SFX V   ЕЮШ  СЦЕФ         МЕЮШ
SFX V   ЕЮШ  СЦЕН         МЕЮШ
SFX V   ЕЮШ  СЗХФ         МЕЮШ
SFX V   ЕЮШ  СЗХ          МЕЮШ
SFX V   ЕЧБФШУС ХЕФУС        [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX V   ЕЧБФШУС ХАФУС        [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX V   ЕЧБФШУС ХЈФУС        [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX V   ЕЧБФШУС АЕЫШУС       [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX V   ЕЧБФШУС АЕФУС        [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX V   ЕЧБФШУС АЕФЕУШ       [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX V   ЕЧБФШУС АЕНУС        [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX V   ЕЧБФШУС ААФУС        [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX V   ЕЧБФШУС ААУШ         [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX V   ЕЧБФШУС АЈЫШУС       [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX V   ЕЧБФШУС АЈФУС        [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX V   ЕЧБФШУС АЈФЕУШ       [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX V   ЕЧБФШУС АЈНУС        [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX V   ЕЧБФШ ХЕЫШ         [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX V   ЕЧБФШ ХЕФЕ         [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX V   ЕЧБФШ ХЕФ          [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX V   ЕЧБФШ ХЕН          [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX V   ЕЧБФШ ХАФ          [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX V   ЕЧБФШ ХА           [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX V   ЕЧБФШ ХЈЫШ         [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX V   ЕЧБФШ ХЈФЕ         [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX V   ЕЧБФШ ХЈФ          [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX V   ЕЧБФШ ХЈН          [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX V   ЕЧБФШ АЕЫШ         [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX V   ЕЧБФШ АЕФЕ         [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX V   ЕЧБФШ АЕФ          [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX V   ЕЧБФШ АЕН          [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX V   ЕЧБФШ ААФ          [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX V   ЕЧБФШ АА           [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX V   ЕЧБФШ АЈЫШ         [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX V   ЕЧБФШ АЈФЕ         [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX V   ЕЧБФШ АЈФ          [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX V   ЕЧБФШ АЈН          [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX V   БФШУС МЕЫШУС       РБФШУС
SFX V   БФШУС МЕФУС        РБФШУС
SFX V   БФШУС МЕФЕУШ       РБФШУС
SFX V   БФШУС МЕНУС        РБФШУС
SFX V   БФШУС МАФУС        РБФШУС
SFX V   БФШУС МАУШ         РБФШУС
SFX V   БФШ  ХФ           ДБФШ
SFX V   БФШ  Х            ДБФШ
SFX V   БФШ  МЕЫШ         РБФШ
SFX V   БФШ  МЕФЕ         РБФШ
SFX V   БФШ  МЕФ          РБФШ
SFX V   БФШ  МЕН          РБФШ
SFX V   БФШ  МАФ          РБФШ
SFX V   БФШ  МА           РБФШ
SFX V   БФШ  ЕЫШ          ДБФШ
SFX V   БФШ  ЕФЕ          ДБФШ
SFX V   БФШ  ЕФ           ДБФШ
SFX V   БФШ  ЕН           ДБФШ
